District of Columbia statutes.
2-220.11

Applicability.

(a)

The requirements of this subchapter shall apply to contracts and agreements for government assistance (“agreement”) entered into after June 8, 2006, and shall not apply to any existing agreement entered into prior to that date. Where an agreement is renewed or extended after that date, that renewal or extension shall be deemed a new agreement and shall trigger coverage under this subchapter if the terms of the renewed or extended agreement otherwise meet the requirements for coverage under this subchapter.

(b)

Notwithstanding the requirements of § 2-220.05(9), a home care agency, community residence facility, or group home for persons with intellectual disabilities shall not be required to pay a living wage until implementing rules are published in the District of Columbia Register and any necessary state plan amendments are approved.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-118, § 111, 53 DCR 2602
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 5(b), 59 DCR 5567
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169 substituted “persons with intellectual disabilities” for “mentally retarded persons” in (b).